Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2805
Habeas corpus; hearing by court or judge; procedure.

On the hearing of any habeas corpus issued as aforesaid, it shall be the duty of the judge or court who shall hear the same to examine the witness or witnesses aforesaid, and such other witnesses as the prisoner may request, touching any offense mentioned in the warrant of commitment, whether the offense be technically set out in the commitment or not. Upon the hearing the judge or court may either recommit, bail or discharge the prisoner, according to the facts of the case.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 357, p. 805;

R.S.1913, § 9251;

C.S.1922, § 10280;

C.S.1929, § 29-2805;

R.S.1943, § 29-2805.